Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.26
Answer to complaint; when.

Within twenty days from the time of service of the complaint and notice the licensee may file his or her sworn answer thereto which shall contain all defenses which he or she intends to assert. No motions or other pleadings shall be authorized.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 26;

Laws 1981, LB 238, § 3;

Laws 1990, LB 350, § 13.